Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 4 Registration and Enforcement

29-11-30.
Registration of guardianship order; recordation of order.

If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in this state, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate county of this state, certified copies of the order and letters of office.

Upon registration of a guardianship order from another state in the manner provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the probate court of this state in which such guardianship order is registered shall:

Record the certified copies of the order and letters of office in the book required to be kept by subparagraph (a)(8)(B) of Code Section 15-9-37; and

Treat the registered and recorded order as a filed foreign judgment as provided in Code Section 9-12-132.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply only if the other state has adopted the “Uniform Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Jurisdiction Act” in substantially the same form as this chapter.

The provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply only if the other state has adopted the “Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Law” in substantially the same form as Article 6 of Chapter 12 of Title 9.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 32/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in this state, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate county of this state, certified copies of the order and letters of office. The provisions of this Code section shall apply only if the other state has adopted the ‘Uniform Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Jurisdiction Act’ in substantially the same form.”

Editor’s notes.

The Uniform Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at O.C.G.A. §

29-11-1

et seq.

29-11-31.
Registration of conservatorship order; recordation of order.

If a conservator has been appointed in another state and a petition for a conservatorship order is not pending in this state, the conservator appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the conservatorship order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court of this state, in any county in which property belonging to the protected person is located, certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond.

Upon registration of a conservatorship order from another state in the manner provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the probate court of this state in which such conservatorship order is registered shall:

Record the certified copies of the order and letters of office in the book required to be kept by subparagraph (a)(8)(B) of Code Section 15-9-37;

Record the certified copy of any bond in the books required to be kept by subparagraph (a)(8)(C) of Code Section 15-9-37 and by subsection (c) of Code Section 29-5-40; and

Treat the registered and recorded order as a filed foreign judgment as provided in Code Section 9-12-132.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply only if the other state has adopted the “Uniform Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Jurisdiction Act” in substantially the same form as this chapter.

The provisions of paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply only if the other state has adopted the “Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Law” in substantially the same form as Article 6 of Chapter 12 of Title 9.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 33/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated the existing first sentence of this Code section as subsection (a); added subsection (b); designated the existing second sentence as paragraph (c)(1); in paragraph (c)(1), added “as this chapter” at the end; and added paragraph (c)(2).

Editor’s notes.

The Uniform Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at O.C.G.A. §

29-11-1

et seq.

29-11-32.
Exercise of powers authorized; enforcement.

Upon registration and recording of a guardianship order or conservatorship order from another state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in this state all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this state, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and, if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

A court of this state may grant any relief available under this chapter, Article 4 of Chapter 4 of this title, Part 4 of Article 9 of Chapter 4 of this title, Article 5 of Chapter 5 of this title, Part 4 of Article 13 of Chapter 5 of this title, and other law of this state to enforce a registered and recorded order.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 9-12-133 shall not apply to this article.

Unless otherwise required by this chapter, service of notice shall not be required under this article as a condition precedent to the registration and recording of a guardianship order from another state under Code Section 29-11-30 or of a conservatorship order from another state under Code Section 29-11-31; provided, however, that the judge of a court of this state may direct such service or notice of such registration and recording as the judge may determine to be proper.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-11-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 1/HB 954; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 34/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, inserted “and recording” near the beginning of subsection (a); in subsection (b), inserted “, Article 4 of Chapter 4 of this title, Part 4 of Article 9 of Chapter 4 of this title, Article 5 of Chapter 5 of this title, Part 4 of Article 13 of Chapter 5 of this title,” in the middle and inserted “and recorded” near the end; and added subsection (c).